Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.380

State compensation denied if payment prevents federal benefits.

If the furnishing of compensation under the provisions of this chapter to an emergency worker or his or her dependents prevents such emergency worker or his or her dependents from receiving assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief under the provisions of a federal statute or rule or regulation, then the emergency worker and his or her dependents shall have no right to, and shall not receive, any compensation from the state of Washington under the provisions of this chapter for any injury for which the United States or any agent thereof will furnish assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief in the absence of the furnishing of compensation by the state of Washington.

[ 2011 c 336 s 799; 1984 c 38 s 39; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 40; 1953 c 223 s 22.]